District of Columbia statutes.
28:9-339

Priority subject to subordination.

This article does not preclude subordination by agreement by a person entitled to priority.

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-201, § 101, 47 DCR 7576

2. Subordination by Agreement. The preceding sections deal elaborately with questions of priority. This section makes it entirely clear that a person entitled to priority may effectively agree to subordinate its claim. Only the person entitled to priority may make such an agreement: a person’s rights cannot be adversely affected by an agreement to which the person is not a party.

1. Source. Former Section 9-316.